Illinois, session 104th, SB3176.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 85-30 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/85-30)7    Sec. 85-30. Purchases; bids. Any purchase by a township 8for services, materials, equipment, or supplies in excess of 9$60,000 $30,000 (other than professional services) shall be 10contracted for in one of the following ways:11        (1) By a contract let to the lowest responsible bidder 12    after advertising for bids at least once (i) in a 13    newspaper published within the township, or (ii) if no 14    newspaper is published within the township, then in one 15    published within the county, or (iii) if no newspaper is 16    published within the county, then in a newspaper having 17    general circulation within the township.18        (2) By a contract let without advertising for bids in 19    the case of an emergency if authorized by the township 20    board.21    This Section does not apply to contracts by a township 22with the federal government.23(Source: P.A. 102-728, eff. 5-6-22.)